New York, session 2025-2026, A8673.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "tropical 2 rainforest economic & environmental sustainability act". 3 § 2. Legislative findings. The legislature finds and declares the 4 following: 5 1. Tropical forests cover roughly 7 percent of Earth's surface, but 6 harbor close to 50 percent of all species on Earth. 7 2. Human activity is the driving force behind the current rate of 8 species extinction, which is at least 100 to 1,000 times higher than 9 historical levels. The Intergovernmental Science-Policy Platform on 10 Biodiversity and Ecosystem Services reported in 2019 that around 1 11 million animal and plant species are now threatened with extinction, 12 many within decades, more than ever before in human history. This is 13 directly linked to habitat loss, with more than a third of the world's 14 land surface and nearly 75 percent of freshwater resources now devoted 15 to crop or livestock production. 16 3. Globally, an estimated 18,000,000 acres of forest, an area more 17 than half the size of New York state, are lost every year to deforesta- 18 tion according to the Food and Agriculture Organization of the United 19 Nations, with over one-half of Earth's tropical forests already gone. At 20 the current pace, the entirety of Earth's tropical rainforests will be 21 degraded or destroyed within the next 100 years. 22 4. A significant percentage of the world's greenhouse gas emissions 23 come from deforestation and forest degradation. Taking into account EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08526-03-5 A. 8673 2 1 carbon sequestration potential, stopping the loss of tropical forests, 2 mangroves, and wetlands could provide over 20 percent of climate miti- 3 gation by 2030. 4 5. Loss of biodiversity resulting from forest degradation and defores- 5 tation, as well as human encroachment on formerly undisturbed ecosys- 6 tems, increases the risks of zoonotic disease pandemics such as COVID- 7 19. 8 6. New York state is a leader in addressing the climate crisis, with a 9 statutory goal of achieving net-zero greenhouse gas emissions economy- 10 wide by 2050. However, our statutory goals miss an important element of 11 our climate footprint represented by our exported emissions, the emis- 12 sions created by the goods we consume. A significant portion of this 13 footprint is driven by tropical deforestation. 14 7. Tropical deforestation in many countries is closely associated with 15 violations of the land rights of indigenous peoples and local communi- 16 ties and with the exploitation of workers, including forced labor and 17 child labor, and in many cases is enabled by corruption, criminality, 18 and violence against conservationists and land defenders. 19 8. Tropical deforestation in many countries is also closely associated 20 with illegal wildlife trafficking, including, but not limited to, vari- 21 ous bird and reptile species, and many primate species, including great 22 apes, pangolins, and orangutans, as well as many tree and plant species, 23 including mahoganies, rosewoods, ebony, and ipe, all of which have 24 recently been listed on the Convention of International Trade in Endan- 25 gered Species of Fauna and Flora (CITES). 26 9. The primary factors leading to tropical deforestation are degrada- 27 tion and road-building associated with logging for timber, which opens 28 the door for deforestation caused by industrial-scale production of 29 agricultural commodities and conversion of forests into plantations for 30 the timber, pulp, paper, palm oil, soy, and livestock industries, among 31 others. Together, these are increasingly known as "forest-risk commod- 32 ities". 33 10. New York is inadvertently promoting and sanctioning deforestation 34 and forest degradation through the purchase of goods and products that 35 have been produced in supply chains that contribute to tropical defores- 36 tation and tropical forest degradation. 37 11. New York has one of the largest economies in the world and its 38 purchasing power has significant market force, allowing it to play a 39 leadership role in preventing forest loss and supporting markets for 40 sustainably-sourced products. 41 12. It is the intent of the legislature that it be the policy of this 42 state to ensure companies contracting with the state are not contribut- 43 ing to tropical deforestation or tropical forest degradation directly or 44 through their supply chains. 45 § 3. Paragraphs b, c, d and e of subdivision 1 of section 165 of the 46 state finance law, as added by chapter 83 of the laws of 1995, are 47 amended to read as follows: 48 b. (i) "Tropical hardwood" shall mean any and all hardwood, scientif- 49 ically classified as angiosperm, that grows in any tropical [moist] 50 forest. Tropical hardwoods shall [be] include but not be limited to the 51 following species: 52 Scientific Name Examples of Common [Name] 53 Names 54 Prunus africana African cherry, Red stinkwood 55 Caryocar costaricense Ajo, Aji 56 Calophyllum spp. Bintangor A. 8673 3 1 Cedrela spp. Cedar 2 Neobalanocarpus heimii, Chengal 3 Balanocarpus heimii 4 Octomeles sumatrana Miq. Erima, benuang 5 Myroxylon balsamum Estoraque 6 Apuleia leiocarpa Garapa 7 Parastemon urophyllus, Parastemon Malas 8 spicatus Ridley 9 Hopea spp. Merawan 10 Araucaria araucana Monkey Puzzle, Chilean pine 11 Pterocarpus tinctorius Mukula 12 Senna siamea Siamese senna 13 Pometia pinata Taun 14 Milletia leucantha Kurz Thinwin 15 Bulnesia arborea, Bulnesia Verawood, Argentine lignum 16 sarmientoi vitae 17 Tristaniopsis laurina Water gum 18 Terminalia spp. 19 Homalium foetidum Malas 20 Dillenia papuana Dillenia 21 Canarium spp. Red Canarium, Grey Canarium 22 Burkrella macropoda Rang rang 23 Octomeles sumatrana Erima, Benuang 24 Dracontomelon dao New Guinea walnut 25 Planchonella spp. White Planchonella, Red 26 Planchonella 27 Lophopetalum spp. Perupok 28 Carinian pyriformis Abarco, Jequitiba 29 Mitragyna ciliate Abura 30 Vouacapous americana Acapu 31 Amburana caerensis Amburana, Cerejeira 32 Dalbergia melanoxylon African Blackwood 33 Lovoa spp. African Walnut, Tigerwood 34 Pericopsis elata [Afrormosis] Afrormosia 35 [Shorea almon] [Almon] 36 Aspidosperma megalocarpon Acaretto 37 Peltogyne spp. Amaranth, purpleheart 38 Terminalia amazonia Amarillo Real 39 [Guibourtis] Guibourtia ehie Amazaque 40 Amburana cearensis Amburana, Cerejeira, cumare 41 Pterogyne nitens Amendoim 42 Carapa guianensis Andiroba, False Mahogany 43 Dicorynia guianensis Angilique Cris 44 [Aningeris] Aningeria spp. Aningeria, anegre, 45 anigre 46 Dipterocarpus [grandiflorus] [Apilong] Apitong, Keruing 47 spp. 48 Centrolobium spp. Arariba, Amarillo 49 Brosimum utile Baco 50 Shorea spp. Balau, Selangan batu 51 Ochroma lagopus Balsa 52 Ochroma pyramidale Balsa 53 Myroxylon balsamum Balsamo 54 [Virola spp.] [Banak] 55 [Anisoptera thurifera] [Bella Rose] 56 [Guibourtis] Guibourtia arnoldiana A. 8673 4 1 Benge, Mutenye 2 Berlinia spp. Berlinia, Rose Zebrano 3 Symphonia globulifera Boar Wood 4 Deterium [Senegalese] senegalese Boire 5 Caesalpinia echintata, Brazilwood, Pernambuco 6 Paubrasilia eschinata 7 Bertholletia excels Brazil Tree 8 Brosimum alicastrum Breadnut 9 Guilbourtia spp. Bubinga, African 10 (G. demusei, G. pellegriniana, Rosewood, Kevazingo 11 G. tessmannii) 12 Toona calantas, Cedrela calantas Calantas, Kalantas 13 Priora copaifera Cativo 14 Cedrela odorata, Cedrela fissilis Cedro, Cedar, Spanish cedar, 15 South American cedar 16 Ceiba pentandra Ceiba 17 Antiaris africana Chenchen, Antiaris 18 Couratari guianensis Coco Blanco 19 [Dalbergis] Dalbergia 20 retusa [Concobola] Cocobolo, 21 Granadillo 22 Tabebuia donnell-smithii Copal 23 Daniellia spp. Copal, Daniellia 24 Cordia spp. Cordia, Bocote, Ziricote, Louro 25 Hymenaea courbaril Courbaril, West Indian Locust 26 Dipteryx odorata Cumaru 27 Piptadeniastrum africanum Dahoma, Banzu 28 Calycophyllum candidissimum Degame, Legame Lancewood, 29 Lemonwood 30 Afzelia spp. Doussie, Lingue 31 [Diospyros] Diospyrus spp. Ebony, Macassar 32 ebony, 33 Ceylon ebony 34 Lophira alata Ekki, Azobe, Bangassi, Akoura, 35 Red Ironwood 36 Combretodendron macrocarpum Esia, Essia 37 Cordia goeldiana Freijo, Cordia Wood 38 Chlorophora tinctoria Fustic, Yellow Wood, Tatajuba 39 [Aucoumes] Aucoumea klaineana Gaboon, Okoume 40 Astronium spp. Goncalo Alves, Zebrawood, 41 Tigerwood 42 Ocotea rodiaei Greenheart 43 Enterolobium cyclocarpum Guanacaste, Rain Tree, 44 Elephant Ear 45 Guarea spp. Guarea, Bosse 46 Terminalia ivorensis Idigbo, Framire, Black Afara 47 Phoebe porosa Imbuia, Imbuya, Embuia, 48 Brazilian Walnut 49 Handroanthus spp. Ipe, Brazilian walnut, 50 bethabarra, Pau d'arco, 51 Ironwood, Lapacho 52 Chlorophors excelsa Iroko 53 Hymenaea courbaril Jatoba, "Brazilian Cherry" 54 Jacaranda copaia Jacaranda 55 Machaerium villosum Jacaranda Pardo 56 Dyera costulata Jelutong A. 8673 5 1 Dryobalanops spp. Kapur, Keladan 2 Koompassia malaccensis Kempas, Impas 3 Acacia koa Koa 4 Entandrophragma candollei Kosipo, Omu 5 Pterygota macrocarpa Koto, African Pterygota, Ware 6 Oxandra lanceolate Lancewood 7 Shorea spp. [negrosensis] [Red] Lauan, Luan, 8 Lawaan, Meranti, White 9 meranti, yellow meranti, dark 10 red meranti, light red meranti, 11 Seraya, Tanguile, Bang, 12 Philippine Mahogany 13 [Pentacme contorta] [White Lauan] 14 [Shores ploysprma] [Tanguile] 15 Nothofagus pumilio Lenga 16 Guaiacum officinale Lignum Vitae, Guayacan, 17 Ironwood 18 Terminalia superba Limba, Afara, Ofram 19 [Aniba duckei] Aniba rosedora [Louro] Brazilian 20 rosewood, pau rosa, bois 21 de rose 22 Nectandra spp. Louro Preto 23 [Kyaya ivorensis] Khaya spp. [Africa] African 24 Mahogany 25 [Swletenia macrophylla] [Amer. Mahogany] 26 Swietenia spp. American Mahogany, West Indian 27 Mahogany, Central American 28 Mahogany, Honduran Mahogany, 29 South American Mahogany, 30 Mexican Mahogany, Bigleaf 31 Mahogany, Little Leaf 32 Mahogany, Acajou, Caoba 33 Mogno 34 Tieghemella [leckellii] heckelii [Makora] 35 Makore, 36 Baku 37 Diospyros marmorata Marblewood, Zebrawood 38 Intsia bijuga, Intsia palembanica Merbau, Ipil, Kwila 39 Anisoptera spp. Mersawa, Krabak, Palosapis, 40 Bella Rosa 41 Mora excelsa Mora 42 Distemonanthus benthamianus Movingui, Ayan 43 Terminalia amazonia Nargusta 44 Pterocarpus spp. Narra, Ambyna, Papua New Guinea 45 Rosewood, Red Sanders, Mukula, 46 Kosso, zitan, Hongmu, Pandauk, 47 Vermillion Wood 48 Palaquium spp. Nyatoh, Padang, Pencil Cedar 49 Triplochiton scleroxylon Obeche, Samba 50 Nauclea diderrichii Opepe, Sibo 51 [Pterocarpus soyauxii] [African Padauk] 52 [Pterocarpus angolensis] [Angola Padauk] 53 Millettia stuhlmannii Panga Panga 54 Balfourodendron riedelianum Pau Marfim 55 Aspidosperma spp. Peroba, Rosa 56 Paratecoma peroba Peroba Branca A. 8673 6 1 Dalbergia frutescens, D. tomentosa Pinkwood, Brazilia Tulipwood 2 Tabebuia donnell-smithii Prima Vera, Roble, Durango 3 Peltogyne spp. Purpleheart 4 Gonystylus spp. Ramin 5 Melanorrhoea curtisii Rengas, Borneo Rosewood 6 Nothofagus obliqua Roble 7 Hevea brasiliensis Rubberwood 8 Dalbergia spp. Rosewood, Indian Rosewood, 9 Honduras Rosewood, cocobolo, 10 granadillo 11 Aniba duckei Brazilian Rosewood 12 [Entandrophragm a] Entandrophragma 13 cylindricum [Sapela] Sapele, Sapelli 14 Acanthopanax ricinofolius Sen, Castor Arabia 15 Brosimum aubletti, Piratinera Snakewood, Letterwood, Leopard 16 guianensis Wood 17 [Shores phillippinensis] [Sonora] 18 Juglans spp. (juglans South American Walnut, Peruvian 19 australis, J. neotropica, Walnut, Tropical Walnut 20 J. Olanchana, etc.) 21 Sterculia rhinopetala Sterculia 22 Bagassa guianensis Tatajuba, Bagasse 23 Tectona grandis Teak 24 Lovoa trichilloides Tigerwood 25 Entandrophragma utile Utile, Sipo 26 Virola spp. Virola, Cumala, Banak, Tapsava 27 Milletia laurentii Wenge 28 Pentacme contorta White Lauan 29 Microberlinia [brazzavillensis] Zebrawood, 30 spp. Zebrano, Zingana 31 (ii) No later than January first, two thousand twenty-nine, and at 32 least every three years thereafter, the department of environmental 33 conservation, in consultation with the office of general services, shall 34 through regulations update the list of tropical hardwood species in 35 subparagraph (i) of this paragraph to ensure that such list includes all 36 such species that are currently commonly available for commercial use in 37 the United States, reflecting the most current data on production, 38 trade, and marketing, and to account for any changes in taxonomy, 39 marketing or trade names, market preference, usage, or other factors. 40 Species shall not be removed from the list of examples except for 41 purposes of correcting errors. 42 c. "Tropical [rain] forests" shall mean [any and all forests classi- 43 fied by the scientific term "Tropical moist forests", the classification 44 determined by the equatorial region of the forest and average rainfall] 45 a natural ecosystem within the tropical regions, approximately bounded 46 geographically by the tropics of Cancer and Capricorn, but possibly 47 affected by other factors such as prevailing winds, containing native 48 species composition, structure, and ecological function, with a tree 49 canopy cover of more than ten percent over an area of at least 0.5 50 hectares. "Tropical forests" shall include all of the following: (i) 51 human-managed tropical forests or partially degraded tropical forests 52 that are regenerating; and (ii) tropical forests identified by multi-ob- 53 jective conservation based assessment methodologies, such as High 54 Conservation Value (HCV) areas, as defined by the HCV Resource Network, 55 or High Carbon Stock forests, as defined by the High Carbon Stock A. 8673 7 1 Approach, or by another methodology with equivalent or higher standards 2 that includes primary forests and tropical peatlands of any depth. 3 "Tropical forests" shall not include tree plantations of any type. 4 d. "Tropical hardwood products" shall mean any wood products, whole- 5 sale or retail, in any form, including but not limited to plywood, 6 veneer, furniture, cabinets, paneling, siding, moldings, doors, doors- 7 kins, joinery, flooring or sawnwood, which are composed, in whole or in 8 part, of tropical hardwood [except plywood]. 9 e. "Peat" means a soil that is rich in organic matter composed of 10 partially decomposed plant materials equal to or greater than 40 centi- 11 meters of the top 100 centimeters of the soil. 12 f. "Tropical peatlands" means wetlands within the tropical regions 13 with a layer of peat made up of dead and decaying plant material. Trop- 14 ical peatlands includes moors, bogs, mires, and peat swamp forests. 15 g. "Secondary materials" means any material recovered from or other- 16 wise destined for the waste stream, including, but not limited to, post- 17 consumer material, industrial scrap material and [overstock or] obsolete 18 inventories from distributors, wholesalers and other companies but such 19 term does not include those materials and by-products generated from, 20 and commonly reused within, an original manufacturing process. 21 § 4. Paragraphs a, b, c, and d of subdivision 2 of section 165 of the 22 state finance law, as added by chapter 83 of the laws of 1995, are 23 amended and four new paragraphs e, f, g and h are added to read as 24 follows: 25 a. Except as hereinafter provided, the state and any governmental 26 agency or political subdivision or public benefit corporation of the 27 state shall not purchase or obtain for any purpose any tropical hard- 28 woods or tropical hardwood products, wholesale or retail, in any form, 29 unless such tropical hardwoods or tropical hardwood products are second- 30 ary materials. 31 b. The provisions of paragraph a of this subdivision shall not apply 32 to: 33 (i) [Any hardwoods purchased from a sustained, managed forest; or 34 (ii)] Any binding contractual obligations for purchase of commodities 35 entered into prior to August twenty-fifth, nineteen hundred ninety-one; 36 or 37 [(iii) The purchase of any tropical hardwood or tropical hardwood 38 product for which there is no acceptable non-tropical hardwood species; 39 or 40 (iv) Where the contracting officer finds that no person or entity 41 doing business in the state is capable of providing acceptable non-trop- 42 ical hardwood species sufficient to meet the particular contract 43 requirements; or 44 (v)] (ii) Where the inclusion or application of such provisions will 45 violate or be inconsistent with the terms or conditions of a grant, 46 subvention or contract in an agency of the United States or the 47 instructions of an authorized representative of any such agency with 48 respect to any such grant, subvention or contract[; or 49 (vi) Where inclusion or application of such provisions results in a 50 substantial cost increase to the state, government agency, political 51 subdivision, public corporation or public benefit corporation]. 52 c. (i) In the case of any bid proposal or solicitation, request for 53 bid or proposal or contract for the construction of any public work, 54 building maintenance or improvement for or on behalf of the state and 55 any governmental agency or political subdivision or public benefit 56 corporation of the state, it shall not require or permit the use of any A. 8673 8 1 tropical hardwood or [wood] tropical hardwood product, unless such trop- 2 ical hardwood or tropical hardwood product is a secondary material. 3 (ii) Every bid proposal, solicitation, request for bid or proposal and 4 contract for the construction of any public work, building maintenance 5 or improvement shall contain a statement that any bid, proposal or other 6 response to a solicitation for bid or proposal which proposes or calls 7 for the use of any tropical hardwood or [wood] tropical hardwood product 8 in performance of the contract shall be deemed non-responsive, unless 9 such tropical hardwood or tropical hardwood product is a secondary mate- 10 rial. 11 d. The provisions of paragraph c of this subdivision shall not apply: 12 (i) To bid packages advertised and made available to the public or any 13 competitive and sealed bids received or entered into prior to August 14 twenty-fifth, nineteen hundred ninety-one; or 15 (ii) To any amendment, modification or renewal of a contract, which 16 contract was entered into prior to August twenty-fifth, nineteen hundred 17 ninety-one, where such application would delay timely completion of a 18 project or involve an increase in the total monies to be paid under that 19 contract; or 20 (iii) Where the contracting officer finds that[: 21 (A) No person or entity doing business in the state is capable of 22 performing the contract using acceptable non-tropical hardwood species; 23 or 24 (B) The] the inclusion or application of such provisions will violate 25 or be inconsistent with the terms or conditions of a grant, subvention 26 or contract with an agency of the United States or the instructions of 27 an authorized representative of any such agency with respect to any such 28 grant, subvention or contract[; or 29 (C) The use of tropical woods is deemed necessary for purposes of 30 historical restoration and there exists no available acceptable non- 31 tropical wood species]. 32 e. The use of any tropical hardwood or tropical hardwood product as 33 part of the construction, renovation, maintenance, or installation of 34 any public work, building or other structure, or improvement on lands 35 owned or managed by the state or any governmental agency or political 36 subdivision or public benefit corporation of the state shall be prohib- 37 ited, except where such prohibition would violate or be inconsistent 38 with the terms and conditions of a grant, subvention or contract with an 39 agency of the United States or the instructions of an authorized repre- 40 sentative of any such agency with respect to any such grant, subvention, 41 or contract. 42 f. (i) Until January first, two thousand thirty-one, the provisions of 43 paragraphs a, c, and e of this subdivision shall not apply to the use of 44 ekki wood by the metropolitan transportation authority for the purpose 45 of railroad ties in the New York city transit system, provided that the 46 metropolitan transportation authority shall, no later than October 47 first, two thousand twenty-six, after providing notice and an opportu- 48 nity for public comment, develop and issue an ekki transition plan 49 outlining the steps the authority will take to minimize to the greatest 50 extent possible, and eventually phase out, the use of ekki wood, and 51 provided further that until such phase out has been completed, such 52 agency shall use, to the greatest extent possible, only secondary mate- 53 rials when the use of ekki wood is specified and unavoidable. Such plan 54 shall be made publicly available on the authority's website. No later 55 than October first, two thousand twenty-seven, and annually thereafter A. 8673 9 1 until the expiration of this paragraph, the authority shall issue a 2 public report outlining its progress toward achieving such plan. 3 (ii) If, on or after April first, two thousand thirty, the director of 4 the budget issues a determination, after providing notice and an oppor- 5 tunity for public comment, that the authority has made significant 6 progress in phasing out the use of ekki wood, but that a full phase out 7 has been delayed due to technical or safety considerations, the 8 provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph may be extended until 9 December thirty-first of the subsequent calendar year. Such determi- 10 nation may be made annually thereafter, on or after April first of 11 subsequent years, provided that under no circumstances shall the 12 provisions of this paragraph extend beyond January first, two thousand 13 thirty-six. 14 g. (i) Until January first, two thousand thirty-four, the provisions 15 of paragraphs a, c, and e of this subdivision shall not apply to the use 16 of greenheart wood by a ferry service directly owned and operated by an 17 agency of a city of one million or more, provided that such agency 18 shall, no later than October first, two thousand twenty-six, after 19 providing notice and an opportunity for public comment, develop and 20 issue a greenheart transition plan outlining the steps such agency will 21 take to minimize to the greatest extent possible, and eventually phase 22 out, the use of greenheart wood, and provided further that until such 23 phase out has been completed, such agency shall use, to the greatest 24 extent possible, only secondary materials when the use of greenheart 25 wood is specified and unavoidable. Such plan shall be made publicly 26 available on the agency's website. No later than October first, two 27 thousand twenty-seven, and annually thereafter until the expiration of 28 this paragraph, the agency shall issue a public report outlining its 29 progress toward achieving such plan. 30 (ii) If, on or after April first, two thousand thirty-three, the 31 director of the budget issues a determination, after providing notice 32 and an opportunity for public comment, that such agency has made signif- 33 icant progress in phasing out the use of greenheart wood, but that a 34 full phase out has been delayed due to technical or safety consider- 35 ations, the provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph may be 36 extended until December thirty-first of the subsequent calendar year. 37 Such determination may be made annually thereafter, on or after April 38 first of subsequent years, provided that under no circumstances shall 39 the provisions of this paragraph extend beyond January first, two thou- 40 sand thirty-nine. 41 h. (i) Until January first, two thousand thirty-four, the provisions 42 of paragraphs a, c, and e of this subdivision shall not apply to the use 43 of greenheart wood on bridges managed by the department of transporta- 44 tion of a city of one million or more, provided that such department 45 shall, no later than October first, two thousand twenty-six, after 46 providing notice and an opportunity for public comment, develop and 47 issue a greenheart transition plan outlining the steps such department 48 will take to minimize to the greatest extent possible, and eventually 49 phase out, the use of greenheart wood, and provided further that until 50 such phase out has been completed, such department shall use, to the 51 greatest extent possible, only secondary materials when the use of 52 greenheart wood is specified and unavoidable. Such plan shall be made 53 publicly available on the department's website. No later than October 54 first, two thousand twenty-seven, and annually thereafter until the 55 expiration of this paragraph, the department shall issue a public report 56 outlining its progress toward achieving such plan. A. 8673 10 1 (ii) If, on or after April first, two thousand thirty-three, the 2 director of the budget issues a determination, after providing notice 3 and an opportunity for public comment, that such department has made 4 significant progress in phasing out the use of greenheart wood, but that 5 a full phase out has been delayed due to technical or safety consider- 6 ations, the provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph may be 7 extended until December thirty-first of the subsequent calendar year. 8 Such determination may be made annually thereafter, on or after April 9 first of subsequent years, provided that under no circumstances shall 10 the provisions of this paragraph extend beyond January first, two thou- 11 sand thirty-nine. 12 § 5. Section 165 of the state finance law is amended by adding a new 13 subdivision 10 to read as follows: 14 10. Tropical deforestation-free procurement. a. For purposes of this 15 subdivision, the following definitions shall apply: 16 (i) "Contractor" means any person or entity that has a contract with a 17 state agency or state authority for public works or improvements to be 18 performed, for a franchise, concession or lease of property, for grant 19 monies or goods and services or supplies to be purchased at the expense 20 of the agency or authority or to be paid out of monies deposited in the 21 treasury or out of trust monies under the control or collected by the 22 agency or authority. 23 (ii) "Tropical forest-risk commodity" means any commodity and its 24 derived products, including agricultural and non-agricultural commod- 25 ities but excluding tropical hardwood and tropical hardwood products 26 covered by subdivisions one and two of this section, whether in raw or 27 processed form, that is commonly extracted from, or grown, derived, 28 harvested, reared, or produced on land where tropical deforestation or 29 tropical forest degradation has occurred or is likely to occur. Tropical 30 forest-risk commodities include palm oil, beef, coffee, cocoa, wood 31 pulp, paper and any additional commodities defined by the commissioner 32 pursuant to subparagraph (i) of paragraph g of this subdivision, but do 33 not include recovered fiber. 34 (iii) "Covered tropical forest-risk product type" means any product 35 type listed by the department of environmental conservation pursuant to 36 subparagraph (ii) of paragraph g of this subdivision. 37 (iv) "Free, prior, and informed consent" means the principle that a 38 community has the right to give or withhold its consent to proposed 39 developments that may affect the land and waters it legally or customar- 40 ily owns, occupies, or otherwise uses, as described in the United 41 Nations Declaration on the Rights of Indigenous Peoples, the Indigenous 42 and Tribal Peoples Convention of 1989, also known as the International 43 Labor Organization Convention 169, and other international instruments. 44 "Free, prior, and informed consent" means informed, noncoercive negoti- 45 ations between investors, companies, or governments, and indigenous 46 peoples and local communities, prior to project development. 47 (v) "Large contractor" means any contractor whose annual revenue, or 48 that of their parent company, is equal to or greater than one hundred 49 million dollars. 50 (vi) "Recovered Fiber" means postconsumer fiber such as paper, paper- 51 board, and fibrous materials from retail stores, office buildings, 52 homes, and so forth, after having passed through their end usage, 53 including used corrugated boxes, old newspapers, old magazines, mixed 54 waste paper, tabulating cards, and used cordage, and all paper, paper- 55 board, and fibrous materials that enter and are collected from municipal 56 solid waste; and manufacturing wastes such as dry paper and paperboard A. 8673 11 1 waste generated after completion of the papermaking process, including 2 envelope cuttings, bindery trimmings, and other paper and paperboard 3 waste resulting from printing, cutting, forming, and other converting 4 operations, bag, box, and carton manufacturing wastes, and butt rolls, 5 mill wrappers, and rejected unused stock, and repulped finished paper 6 and paperboard from obsolete inventories of paper and paperboard 7 manufacturers, merchants, wholesalers, dealers, printers, converters, 8 and others. 9 (vii) "Tree plantation" means an area of land predominantly composed 10 of trees established through planting and/or deliberate seeding, usually 11 by planting one or two species, for the purpose of producing and 12 harvesting a particular commodity. Tree plantation does not include 13 forest planted for ecosystem restoration. 14 (viii) "Tropical deforestation" means direct human-induced conversion 15 of tropical forest to agriculture, a tree plantation, or other non-for- 16 est land use. 17 (ix) "Tropical forest degradation" means direct human-induced severe 18 and sustained degradation of a tropical forest resulting in significant 19 forest loss and/or a profound change in species composition, structure, 20 or ecological function of that forest. 21 (x) "New York state products" means products that are grown, 22 harvested, or produced in this state, or processed inside or outside 23 this state comprising over fifty-one percent raw materials grown, 24 harvested, or produced in this state, by weight or volume. 25 (xi) "Small business" means small business as defined in section one 26 hundred thirty-one of the economic development law. 27 (xii) "Medium-sized business" shall mean a business that is resident 28 in this state, independently owned and operated, not dominant in its 29 field, and employs between one hundred and five hundred persons. 30 (xiii) "Minority-owned business enterprise" shall have the same mean- 31 ing as in article fifteen-A of the executive law. 32 (xiv) "Women-owned business enterprise" shall have the same meaning as 33 in article fifteen-A of the executive law. 34 b. (i) Every contract entered into by a state agency or authority that 35 includes the procurement of any covered tropical forest-risk product 36 type shall require that the contractor certify, after completing neces- 37 sary due diligence measures as determined by the commissioner of the 38 department of environmental conservation pursuant to paragraph g of this 39 subdivision, that, to the best of the contractor's knowledge, the 40 products furnished to the state pursuant to the contract do not contain 41 any tropical forest-risk commodities that were extracted from, grown, 42 derived, harvested, reared, or produced on land where tropical defores- 43 tation or tropical forest degradation occurred on or after January 44 first, two thousand twenty-three. The contractor shall agree to comply 45 with this provision of the contract. 46 (ii) The contract shall specify that the contractor is required to 47 cooperate fully in providing reasonable access to the contractor's 48 records, documents, agents, employees, or premises if reasonably 49 required by authorized officials of the contracting agency or authority, 50 the office of general services, the office of the attorney general, or 51 the department of environmental conservation, to determine the contrac- 52 tor's compliance with the requirements of this paragraph. 53 (iii) Contractors shall exercise due diligence in ensuring that their 54 subcontractors comply with the requirements of this paragraph. Contrac- 55 tors shall require each subcontractor to certify that the subcontractor 56 is in compliance with the requirements of this paragraph. A. 8673 12 1 (iv) In addition to the requirements of subparagraphs (i), (ii) and 2 (iii) of this paragraph, large contractors subject to this paragraph 3 must certify that they have adopted a tropical forest policy that 4 complies with regulations issued pursuant to subparagraph (vi) of para- 5 graph g of this subdivision. Such tropical forest policy and data docu- 6 menting implementation shall be made publicly available and updated 7 annually, and shall include, at a minimum: 8 A. Procedures for identifying and mitigating the risk of tropical 9 deforestation and tropical forest degradation in tropical forest-risk 10 commodity supply chains. 11 B. Procedures to ensure respect for nationally and internationally 12 recognized rights of indigenous peoples and local communities, including 13 the principle of free, prior and informed consent, the rights and safety 14 of local environmental and human rights defenders, the rights of work- 15 ers, and compliance with source country laws, in tropical forest-risk 16 commodity supply chains. 17 (v) The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to primary, 18 secondary, or tertiary packaging used for the purpose of containment, 19 protection, handling, delivery, transport, distribution, or presentation 20 of a covered tropical forest-risk product type. 21 (vi) The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply when the inclu- 22 sion or application of such provisions will violate or be inconsistent 23 with the terms or conditions of a grant, subvention or contract with an 24 agency of the United States or the instructions of an authorized repre- 25 sentative of any such agency with respect to any such grant, subvention 26 or contract. 27 (vii) The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply if the head of 28 the contracting state agency or authority issuing a solicitation for 29 covered tropical forest-risk product types issues a determination, after 30 providing notice and an opportunity for public comment, with the 31 approval of the director of the budget, that upon the closing of such 32 solicitation such provisions have resulted in the failure to receive any 33 offers in response to such solicitation and that there is no alternative 34 product available that is able to meet the generally accepted standard 35 performance requirements for the specified application within such 36 solicitation. Such determination shall explain in detail the necessity 37 of such exemption for each specified application, including a list of 38 all available alternative products considered and an explanation as to 39 why each product does not meet the relevant generally accepted perform- 40 ance requirements. Such determination shall be made publicly available, 41 in writing, on the website of the office of general services and the 42 relevant agency or authority. If the head of the contracting state agen- 43 cy or authority has not issued such a determination for three consec- 44 utive years, then the power of the head of the contracting state agency 45 or authority to issue such a determination shall be deemed expired, and 46 any subsequent determination shall be null and void. 47 (viii) The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to a central- 48 ized contract developed by the office of general services if, during the 49 process of developing such centralized contract, the commissioner of 50 general services issues a determination, after providing notice and an 51 opportunity for public comment, with the approval of the director of the 52 budget, that incorporating the provisions of this paragraph will result 53 in a failure to receive any bids in response to a solicitation for such 54 centralized contract, and that there is no alternative product available 55 that is able to meet the generally accepted standard performance 56 requirements for the specified application within such contract. Such A. 8673 13 1 determination shall explain in detail the necessity of such exemption 2 for each specified application, including a list of all available alter- 3 native products considered and an explanation as to why each product 4 does not meet the relevant generally accepted performance requirements. 5 Such determination shall be made publicly available, in writing, on the 6 website of the office of general services. If such a determination is 7 issued in regards to a centralized contract, such contract shall have a 8 term of no more than three years. 9 (ix) Until January first, two thousand thirty-two, the provisions of 10 this paragraph shall only apply to contracts with a total value greater 11 than or equal to one million dollars, or to contractors whose annual 12 revenue, or that of their parent company, is greater than or equal to 13 ten million dollars. 14 c. (i) If it is determined that any contractor contracting with the 15 state knew or should have known that a covered forest-risk product type 16 was furnished to the state in violation of this subdivision, the 17 contracting agency or authority shall issue a written notice of 18 violation and provide an opportunity for such contractor to come into 19 compliance. If, after such notice, a contractor fails to come into 20 compliance within a timeframe established by the commissioner of the 21 department of environmental conservation, such contractor may, subject 22 to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, have either or both of the 23 following sanctions imposed: 24 A. The contract under which the violation occurred may be voided at 25 the option of the contracting agency or authority. 26 B. The contractor may be assessed a penalty that shall be the greater 27 of one thousand dollars or an amount equaling twenty percent of the 28 value of the product that the state agency or authority demonstrates was 29 furnished in violation of this subdivision. A hearing or opportunity to 30 be heard shall be provided prior to the assessment of any penalty. 31 (ii) Notwithstanding subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, a contractor 32 that has complied with the provisions of subparagraph (iii) of paragraph 33 b of this subdivision shall not be subject to sanctions for violations, 34 of which the contractor had no knowledge, of the requirements of this 35 subdivision that were committed solely by a subcontractor. Sanctions 36 described under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph shall instead be 37 imposed against the subcontractor that committed the violation. 38 d. (i) Any state agency or authority that investigates a complaint 39 against a contractor or subcontractor for violation of this subdivision 40 may limit its investigation to evaluating the information provided by 41 the person or entity submitting the complaint and the information 42 provided by the contractor or subcontractor. 43 (ii) Whenever a contracting officer of the contracting agency or 44 authority has reason to believe that the contractor failed to comply 45 with paragraph b of this subdivision, the agency or authority shall 46 refer the matter for investigation to the head of the agency or authori- 47 ty and, as the head of the agency or authority determines appropriate, 48 to either the office of the attorney general or the department of envi- 49 ronmental conservation. 50 e. (i) When a state agency or authority's contract for the purchase of 51 a commodity or product covered by this subdivision is to be awarded to 52 the lowest responsible bidder, an otherwise qualified bidder who is a 53 small or medium-sized business or a minority or women-owned business 54 enterprise, or who will fulfill the contract through the use of New York 55 state products, may be given preference over other bidders, provided 56 that the cost included in the bid is not more than ten percent greater A. 8673 14 1 than the cost included in a bid that is not from a small or medium-sized 2 business or a minority or women-owned business enterprise or fulfilled 3 through the use of New York state products. 4 (ii) The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply if the head of 5 the contracting state agency or authority purchasing such products, in 6 such head of such state agency's sole discretion, determines that giving 7 preference to bidders pursuant to the provisions of this paragraph 8 would: 9 (a) be against the public interest; 10 (b) increase the cost of the contract by an unreasonable amount; or 11 (c) New York state products cannot be obtained in sufficient and 12 reasonable available quantities and of satisfactory quality to meet the 13 contracting state agency or authority's requirements. 14 (iii) Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to conflict with or 15 otherwise limit the goals and requirements set forth by section one 16 hundred sixty-two of this article, article fifteen-A of the executive 17 law, or article three of the veterans' services law. 18 f. Prior to issuing regulations pursuant to paragraph g of this subdi- 19 vision, the commissioner of the department of environmental conservation 20 shall convene four meetings with relevant stakeholders, including but 21 not limited to: 22 (i) representatives of current or former state contractors dealing in 23 products containing each of the tropical forest-risk commodities speci- 24 fied in subparagraph (ii) of paragraph a of this subdivision, with an 25 emphasis on small and medium-sized businesses; 26 (ii) representatives not affiliated with covered industries with rele- 27 vant expertise in supply chain traceability, tropical forest sustaina- 28 bility, biodiversity, climate science, human and labor rights, and 29 indigenous rights; and 30 (iii) representatives from indigenous communities within the geograph- 31 ic areas containing tropical forests covered by this subdivision. 32 g. On or before July first, two thousand twenty-seven, the commission- 33 er of the department of environmental conservation shall adopt regu- 34 lations for the implementation of this subdivision. Such regulations 35 shall be developed in consultation with the commissioner of the office 36 of general services. Such regulations shall include, but not be limited 37 to, all of the following: 38 (i) A list of tropical forest-risk commodities subject to the require- 39 ments of this subdivision, including, but not limited to, palm oil, 40 beef, coffee, cocoa, wood pulp and paper. The list shall be reviewed and 41 updated at least every three years. When evaluating inclusion of addi- 42 tional commodities in the list, the commissioner of the department of 43 environmental conservation shall consider the impact of the commodity as 44 a driver of tropical deforestation or tropical forest degradation, the 45 state of existing supply chain transparency and traceability systems for 46 the commodity, the volume or quantity of products comprised wholly or in 47 part of the commodity that are regularly purchased by state agencies or 48 authorities, and the feasibility of including the commodity in the 49 requirements of this subdivision. The first review shall include, but 50 not be limited to, evaluation of soy, rubber, bananas, avocados, sugar- 51 cane, leather and other cattle-derived products, and mining products. 52 Following a review of the list of tropical forest-risk commodities, the 53 commissioner shall issue a report to the governor, the temporary presi- 54 dent of the senate, and the speaker of the assembly, outlining the 55 reasons for the inclusion or non-inclusion of any reviewed commodities. A. 8673 15 1 (ii) A list of covered tropical forest-risk product types comprised 2 wholly or in part of tropical forest-risk commodities. Such list shall 3 be updated no less frequently than every three years. In developing such 4 list, the department shall consider: 5 A. The state of existing supply chain traceability and transparency 6 systems for the product type. 7 B. The volume, quantity, or monetary value of such product type regu- 8 larly procured by state agencies or authorities, with priority given to 9 product types procured in high volumes or quantities or with high mone- 10 tary value. 11 C. The relative complexity of identifying the presence of tropical 12 forest-risk commodities in the product type. 13 D. The proportion of the product type comprised of tropical forest- 14 risk commodities. 15 E. The availability of substitute products produced using commodities 16 sourced from New York State or within the United States. 17 F. Maximizing the deforestation-reduction impact of the policy estab- 18 lished pursuant to this subdivision while limiting the administrative 19 burden of implementation, including consideration of a phased-in 20 approach to implementation with the goal of covering all product types 21 regularly procured by state agencies or authorities containing more than 22 de minimus amounts of tropical forest-risk commodities or their deriva- 23 tives no later than January first, two thousand thirty-two. For food 24 products, more than de minimus amounts shall include components listed 25 as an ingredient. 26 (iii) Specific supply chain due diligence measures based on interna- 27 tional best practices that contractors must perform before making the 28 certification required by this subdivision. For any products comprised 29 wholly or in part of tropical forest-risk commodities that were 30 extracted from, grown, harvested, or reared on land in a country or 31 countries that do not contain tropical forests, a contractor shall only 32 be required to demonstrate that such commodities originated in such 33 country or countries. If information, documents, and data that meet the 34 requirements of the due diligence measures established pursuant to this 35 subparagraph have been produced by a supplier from whom the contractor 36 has been supplied covered products, and have been provided to the 37 contractor or made publicly available, such information, documents, and 38 data may constitute sufficient due diligence on the part of the contrac- 39 tor to comply with this paragraph. 40 (iv) A process for developing, with an opportunity for public input, 41 list of favored suppliers of tropical forest-risk commodities and 42 products derived therefrom whose products have been determined to meet 43 the requirements of this subdivision, and a process through which 44 suppliers may apply for inclusion on such list. Such list shall be made 45 publicly available no later than one hundred eighty days after the 46 adoption of regulations pursuant to this paragraph, and shall be updated 47 not less than annually. 48 (v) The full set of requirements for a large contractor's tropical 49 forest policy pursuant to subparagraph (iv) of paragraph b of this 50 subdivision. 51 (vi) The process through which contractors shall certify to the 52 department of environmental conservation that they are in compliance 53 with paragraph b of this subdivision. 54 (vii) A process for ensuring that details of certifications are made 55 available for public inspection on the website of the department of 56 environmental conservation. A. 8673 16 1 (viii) An easily accessible procedure to receive public complaints and 2 information regarding violations of this subdivision. 3 h. The certification requirements set forth in this subdivision shall 4 not apply to a credit card purchase of goods of fifteen thousand dollars 5 or less. 6 i. This subdivision shall apply to all contracts entered into, 7 extended, or renewed on or after January first, two thousand twenty- 8 eight. 9 j. Commencing two years after the effective date of this subdivision 10 and biennially thereafter, the commissioner of the department of envi- 11 ronmental conservation shall issue a report to the governor, the tempo- 12 rary president of the senate, and the speaker of the assembly, on the 13 implementation of this subdivision and subdivisions one and two of this 14 section. 15 § 6. The economic development law is amended by adding a new article 16 28 to read as follows: 17 ARTICLE 28 18 SUPPLY CHAIN TRANSPARENCY ASSISTANCE PROGRAM 19 Section 500. Definitions. 20 501. The supply chain transparency assistance program. 21 § 500. Definitions. For purposes of this article: 22 1. "Small business" means a small business as defined in section one 23 hundred thirty-one of this chapter. 24 2. "Medium-sized business" shall mean a business that is resident in 25 this state, independently owned and operated, not dominant in its field, 26 and employs between one hundred and five hundred persons. 27 3. "Eligible business" shall mean any small and medium-sized business 28 as defined in this article, and any minority or women-owned business 29 enterprise as defined in article fifteen-A of the executive law. 30 4. "Supply chain" shall mean a system of extraction, production, 31 transportation, and distribution involving multiple processes, organiza- 32 tions, individuals, and resources, beginning with raw materials and 33 culminating in the delivery of a product or service to a consumer. 34 § 501. The supply chain transparency assistance program. 1. The 35 department is hereby authorized and directed, within one year of the 36 effective date of this article, to establish, develop, implement, and 37 maintain, within available appropriations, a supply chain transparency 38 assistance program to assist small and medium-sized businesses and 39 minority and women-owned businesses in achieving supply chains that are: 40 (a) Transparent, meaning a supply chain for which sufficient informa- 41 tion has been disclosed regarding all relevant units of production from 42 the raw material stage to the delivery of a product or service to a 43 consumer, including, but not limited to, extraction sites, suppliers, 44 manufacturers, transporters, wholesalers, and retailers, to allow 45 consumers to determine whether the supply chain is ethical and sustaina- 46 ble. 47 (b) Traceable, meaning a supply chain for which distributors, retail- 48 ers, and other businesses down the supply chain are able to gather 49 sufficient and relevant information regarding all units of production 50 further up the supply chain to determine whether a supply chain is 51 ethical and sustainable. 52 (c) Ethical, meaning a supply chain that upholds the human rights and 53 all other legal rights, supports the well-being, and prevents the 54 exploitation, of workers and communities, and guarantees the free, 55 prior, and informed consent, land, and other legal rights of affected 56 indigenous peoples and other local and traditional communities. A. 8673 17 1 (d) Sustainable, meaning a supply chain that takes all necessary meas- 2 ures to avoid, minimize, and reduce degradation of natural environmental 3 systems, and maximizes efforts to contribute to the restoration and 4 regeneration of impacted ecosystems. 5 2. The purpose of such program shall be to: 6 (a) Develop and share best practices and provide technical assistance 7 to help participating eligible businesses develop and implement stand- 8 ards, plans, and benchmarks for transparency and traceability, environ- 9 mental sustainability, and ethical practices throughout their supply 10 chains. 11 (b) Assist participating eligible businesses with compliance with 12 supply chain related regulations, procurement standards, or contracting 13 requirements. 14 (c) Identify funding streams, grant monies, financial assistance and 15 other resources that may be available to help participating eligible 16 businesses achieve transparent, traceable, ethical, and sustainable 17 supply chains. 18 (d) Help participating eligible businesses with marketing, communi- 19 cation, and other activities to achieve maximum competitive advantage 20 from their transparent, traceable, ethical, and sustainable supply 21 chains. 22 (e) Conduct market analysis to identify opportunities for participat- 23 ing eligible businesses to access new markets and increase competitive- 24 ness through achieving transparent, traceable, ethical, and sustainable 25 supply chains. 26 (f) Conduct outreach to promote awareness of the program among eligi- 27 ble businesses, business organizations, and regional and local economic 28 development agencies. 29 § 7. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 30 have become a law and shall apply to all contracts and binding contrac- 31 tual obligations entered into on and after such effective date.